Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Knights of Pythias

48-102-301. Ownership of real property.

The officers and members of a lodge of the order of Knights of Pythias may purchase, own, hold, or take, by deed or otherwise, such quantity of ground or real estate for the purpose of building a hall, or edifice, or for a burial place, as may be deemed necessary by such officers and members, or to purchase, own, hold, or take, by deed or otherwise, a lot and building, or lots and buildings, for the purpose of converting the same into and using the same as a suitable hall. The deed, or other instrument, shall vest the legal and equitable title to the real estate in such officers and members and their successors, in the name of the lodge, and for its use and benefit.

Acts 1905, ch. 141, § 1; Shan., § 2577a1; mod. Code 1932, § 4416; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1516, 48-4-301.

48-102-302. Debt incurred for purchase or improvement of realty.

All such lodges have the power to issue evidences of indebtedness, bearing legal interest, secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the real estate, for the purpose of purchasing a suitable building or buildings for hall purposes or of erecting a building or hall upon their lots, or for the purpose of converting a building or buildings into a suitable hall, or for the purpose of improving or repairing the same, or furnishing the same, or for the purchasing and paying for grounds for burial purposes. All of the lodges which shall issue evidences of indebtedness under this part are empowered to execute a mortgage or deed of trust upon the real estate to secure and make certain the payment of the indebtedness thereby secured.

Such lodges are further empowered, through their proper officials, to execute a mortgage or deed of trust upon any real estate owned by them for the purpose of borrowing money to purchase ground for such burial place, or ground for erecting or remodeling, improving, or repairing a building suitable for hall purposes, as provided for in this part, or for repairing or improving the same whenever it may become necessary, or to secure the payment of any indebtedness already contracted for, as authorized under the terms of this part.

Acts 1905, ch. 141, § 2; Shan., § 2577a2; Code 1932, § 4417; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1517, 48-4-302.

48-102-303. Execution of mortgages and evidences of indebtedness — Liability of members.

The chancellor commander of the lodge has the power to execute and issue the evidences of indebtedness, and to execute any mortgage, deed of trust, transfer, or other conveyance provided for in this part, whenever the chancellor has been instructed by a meeting of the chancellor's lodge to do so. All such evidences of indebtedness, mortgages, deeds of trust, or other conveyances provided for in this part shall be executed by such chancellor commander in the name of the lodge, and shall be attested by the keeper of records and seal of such lodge under its seal.

Neither the chancellor commander, nor the keeper of records and seal, nor any member of the lodge, shall be individually liable for any of the indebtedness incurred by authority of this part.

Acts 1905, ch. 141, § 3; Shan., § 2577a3; Code 1932, § 4418; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1518, 48-4-303.